Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB617.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 100 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Qualifying planning unit" means a planning unit established under this
chapter that is composed of:
1. A city with a population equal to or greater than ten thousand
(10,000);
2. Any combination of cities with a collective population equal to or
greater than fifteen thousand (15,000);
3. A county with population equal to or greater than fifteen thousand
(15,000);
4. Any combination of cities and counties, parts of counties, or parts of
consolidated local governments with a collective population equal to
or greater than twenty thousand (20,000);
5. A consolidated local government; or
6. An urban-county government;
(b) "Qualifying residential development" means a tract of land that is:
1. Five (5) acres or more;
2. Located in an area that is zoned for single-family homes; and
3. The subject of a subdivision plat or development plan submitted to a
qualifying planning unit after the effective date of this Act;
(c) "Service document" means a letter, form, or other document issued by a
water and sewer service provider to an owner or developer of a residential
development that states that a provider is able and willing to provide water
and sewer service to the project or dwelling;
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 2/11/2026 12:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 980
(d) "Small lot" means a residential lot that is four thousand (4,000) square feet
or less; and
(e) "Transitional buffer" means a buffer between residential developments
consisting of no more than two (2) of the following elements:
1. A fence or wall;
2. A berm or mound;
3. Vegetation;
4. Green space; or
5. Another natural barrier.
(2) A qualifying planning unit shall not adopt or enforce any rule or ordinance that
would require:
(a) A residential lot in a qualifying residential development to be:
1. Larger than three thousand (3,000) square feet;
2. Wider than thirty (30) feet; or
3. Deeper than seventy-five (75) feet; or
(b) A small lot in a qualifying residential development to have:
1. Setbacks greater than:
a. Fifteen (15) feet from the front of the property;
b. Ten (10) feet from the back of the property; or
c. Five (5) feet from the side of the property;
2. Covered parking;
3. More than one (1) parking space per unit;
4. Off-site parking;
5. More than thirty percent (30%) open space or permeable surface;
6. Fewer than three (3) full stories not exceeding ten (10) feet in height
measured from the interior floor to ceiling;
7. A maximum building bulk; or
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 2/11/2026 12:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 980
8. An articulation or other architectural requirement the only purpose of
which relates to aesthetics.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section shall not be construed to prohibit a qualifying
planning unit from adopting regulations related to environmental features,
erosion, stormwater management, waterways, or wastewater management,
including a requirement that a qualifying residential development obtain service
documents, if the regulation is generally applicable and the qualifying planning
unit is otherwise authorized to adopt the regulation under state or federal law.
(4) This section shall not be construed to affect, prohibit, preempt, or render
unenforceable any property or use restrictions contained in the properly enacted
rules or regulations of a homeowners association, condominium association, or
other similar property owner association or cooperative.
(5) Any person aggrieved by a qualifying planning unit's violation of any provision
of this section shall have a cause of action in the Circuit Court in the county in
which the person resides. The Circuit Court, in its discretion, may award:
(a) A person that prevails against the qualifying planning unit reasonable
attorney's fees and court costs to be paid by the qualifying planning unit; or
(b) A planning unit that prevails against a person who has brought suit under
this section reasonable attorney's fees and court costs to be paid by that
person, if the Circuit Court determines that the suit was frivolous or
meritless.
(6) (a) If a qualifying planning unit determines that a proposed qualifying
residential development will have substantial negative impacts on:
1. Public safety or the provision of government services, including but
not limited to fire protection, emergency medical services, law
enforcement access, solid waste collection, snow and ice removal, or
the safe movement and operation of emergency vehicles and
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 2/11/2026 12:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 980
equipment;
2. The qualifying planning unit's ability to comply with any requirement
to accommodate public utilities or maintain the provision of utilities to
a service area;
3. The qualifying planning unit's ability to comply with state or federal
laws, regulations, rules, or legal decrees; or
4. Transportation infrastructure, traffic flow, or roadway access
standards;
as a result of the standards set out in subsection (2) of this section, the
qualifying planning unit may request that a developer modify and resubmit
plans for a proposed development to ameliorate or remediate those potential
negative impacts.
(b) A qualifying planning unit that makes a request under paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall:
1. Articulate a specific negative impact or impacts that the proposed
qualifying residential development will have;
2. Articulate the specific requirement under subsection (2) of this section
that would cause a specific negative impact; and
3. Provide the developer with sufficient time to modify and resubmit a
plan.
(c) A qualifying planning unit may deny a proposed qualifying residential
development plan that fails to ameliorate or remediate the negative impacts
under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d) 1. A developer shall have a cause of action in the Circuit Court in the
county in which the qualifying residential development is proposed if a
qualifying planning unit denies a qualifying residential development
plan pursuant to this subsection. The Circuit Court shall determine if:
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 2/11/2026 12:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 980
a. The qualifying planning unit complied with this subsection;
b. The qualifying planning unit's denial is supported by clear and
convincing evidence; and
c. Any negative impact was raised by the qualifying planning unit
for pretextual reasons to improperly deny a proposed
development.
2. a. If the Circuit Court finds in favor of the developer, it shall
require the qualifying planning unit to pay the developer's
reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
b. If the Circuit Court finds in favor of the planning unit and
determines that the suit was frivolous or meritless, it may in its
discretion require the developer to pay the planning unit's
reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a qualifying planning unit may
require a developer to install a transitional buffer when a qualifying residential
development abuts existing residential property developed at a lesser density than
the qualifying residential development, but a transitional buffer shall not be
required that creates more than seventy-five (75) feet of separation between
developments.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 100 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A planning unit shall not adopt or enforce any ordinance or regulation that
would require:
(a) More than one (1) parking space per residential unit;
(b) Any minimum parking requirements for:
1. Existing buildings undergoing a change of use;
2. Licensed child-care facilities;
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 2/11/2026 12:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 980
3. Deed-restricted affordable housing; or
4. Assisted living facilities; or
(c) More than one-half (1/2) parking space for each residential unit that is
under twelve hundred (1,200) square feet.
(2) This section shall not alleviate a developer or planning unit's obligations to
provide accessible parking spaces as required by the Americans with Disabilities
Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq. An accessible parking space shall not count
towards the minimums set out in this section.
(3) This section shall not prohibit a developer from providing more parking spaces
than the minimum number of parking spaces required in any ordinance or
regulation adopted pursuant to this section.
(4) (a) If a planning unit determines that the parking spaces for a proposed
development plan would have substantial negative impacts on:
1. Public safety or the provision of government services, including but
not limited to fire protection, emergency medical services, law
enforcement access, solid waste collection, snow and ice removal, or
the safe movement and operation of emergency vehicles and
equipment;
2. The planning unit's ability to comply with any requirement to
accommodate public utilities or maintain the provision of utilities to a
service area;
3. The planning unit's ability to comply with state or federal laws,
regulations, rules, or legal decrees; or
4. Transportation infrastructure, traffic flow, or roadway access
standards;
as a result of the standards set out in subsection (1) of this section, the
planning unit may request that a developer modify and resubmit
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 2/11/2026 12:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 980
development plans for a proposed development to ameliorate or remediate
those potential negative impacts.
(b) A planning unit that makes a request under paragraph (a) of this subsection
shall:
1. Articulate a specific negative impact or impacts that the proposed
development plan would have;
2. Articulate the specific requirement under subsection (1) of this section
that would cause a specific negative impact; and
3. Provide the developer with sufficient time to modify and resubmit a
development plan.
(c) A planning unit may deny a proposed development plan that fails to
ameliorate or remediate the negative impacts under paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(d) 1. A developer shall have a cause of action in the Circuit Court in the
county in which the development plan is proposed if a planning unit
denies a development plan pursuant to this subsection. The Circuit
Court shall determine if:
a. The planning unit complied with this subsection;
b. The planning unit's denial is supported by clear and convincing
evidence; and
c. Any negative impact was raised by the planning unit for
pretextual reasons to improperly deny a proposed development.
2. a. If the Circuit Court finds in favor of the developer, it shall
require the qualifying planning unit to pay the developer's
reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
b. If the Circuit Court finds in favor of the planning unit and
determines that the suit was frivolous or meritless, it may in its
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 2/11/2026 12:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 980
discretion require the developer to pay the planning unit's
reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 100 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Mixed-use residential development" means a development consisting of
residential and nonresidential uses in which the nonresidential uses
constitute less than fifty percent (50%) of the total square footage of the
development and includes condominiums;
(b) "Multifamily residential development" means a development with three (3)
or more dwelling units within one (1) or more buildings and includes
condominiums; and
(c) "Qualifying planning unit" means a planning unit established under this
chapter that is composed of:
1. A city with a population equal to or greater than ten thousand
(10,000);
2. Any combination of cities with a collective population equal to or
greater than fifteen thousand (15,000);
3. A county with population equal to or greater than fifteen thousand
(15,000);
4. Any combination of cities and counties, parts of counties, or parts of
consolidated local governments with a collective population equal to
or greater than twenty thousand (20,000);
5. A consolidated local government; or
6. An urban-county government.
(2) In a qualifying planning unit, mixed-use residential developments and
multifamily residential developments shall be permitted uses in all commercial
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 2/11/2026 12:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 980
zones.
(3) A qualifying planning unit shall not adopt or enforce any regulation or
ordinance that:
(a) Prohibits mixed-use residential developments or multifamily residential
developments in commercial zones;
(b) Imposes requirements on mixed-use residential developments or multifamily
residential developments that are more restrictive than those placed on
other comparable uses within the commercial zone; or
(c) Requires mixed-use residential developments or multifamily residential
developments to have on the property or share via a parking agreement
more than one (1) off-street parking space for each unit in addition to any
accessible parking spaces required by the Americans with Disabilities Act,
42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq.
Section 4. This Act takes effect July 1, 2027.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 2/11/2026 12:59 PM Jacketed